Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.04, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Provider enrollment. (a) The commissioner shall enroll providers and conduct screening activities as required by Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455, subpart E. A provider must enroll each provider-controlled location where direct services are provided. The commissioner may deny a provider's incomplete application if a provider fails to respond to the commissioner's request for additional information within 60 days of the request. The commissioner must conduct a background study under chapter 245C, including a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), for a provider described in this paragraph. The background study requirement may be satisfied if the commissioner conducted a fingerprint-based background study on the provider that includes a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5). (b) The commissioner shall revalidate eachdeleted text begin : (1)deleted text end provider under this subdivision at least once every deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin threenew text end yearsdeleted text begin ; and (2) personal care assistance agency under this subdivision once every three yearsdeleted text end . (c) The commissioner shall conduct revalidation as follows: (1) provide 30-day notice of the revalidation due date including instructions for revalidation and a list of materials the provider must submit; (2) if a provider fails to submit all required materials by the due date, notify the provider of the deficiency within 30 days after the due date and allow the provider an additional 30 days from the notification date to comply; and (3) if a provider fails to remedy a deficiency within the 30-day time period, give 60-day notice of termination and immediately suspend the provider's ability to bill. The provider does not have the right to appeal suspension of ability to bill. (d) If a provider fails to comply with any individual provider requirement or condition of participation, the commissioner may suspend the provider's ability to bill until the provider comes into compliance. The commissioner's decision to suspend the provider is not subject to an administrative appeal. (e) Correspondence and notifications, including notifications of termination and other actions, may be delivered electronically to a provider's MN-ITS mailbox. This paragraph does not apply to correspondences and notifications related to background studies. (f) If the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that a provider is designated "high-risk," the commissioner may withhold payment from providers within that category upon initial enrollment for a 90-day period. The withholding for each provider must begin on the date of the first submission of a claim. (g) An enrolled provider that is also licensed by the commissioner under chapter 245A, is licensed as a home care provider by the Department of Health under chapter 144A, or is licensed as an assisted living facility under chapter 144G and has a home and community-based services designation on the home care license under section 144A.484, must designate an individual as the entity's compliance officer. The compliance officer must: (1) develop policies and procedures to assure adherence to medical assistance laws and regulations and to prevent inappropriate claims submissions; (2) train the employees of the provider entity, and any agents or subcontractors of the provider entity including billers, on the policies and procedures under clause (1); (3) respond to allegations of improper conduct related to the provision or billing of medical assistance services, and implement action to remediate any resulting problems; (4) use evaluation techniques to monitor compliance with medical assistance laws and regulations; (5) promptly report to the commissioner any identified violations of medical assistance laws or regulations; and (6) within 60 days of discovery by the provider of a medical assistance reimbursement overpayment, report the overpayment to the commissioner and make arrangements with the commissioner for the commissioner's recovery of the overpayment. The commissioner may require, as a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, that a provider within a particular industry sector or category establish a compliance program that contains the core elements established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (h) The commissioner may revoke the enrollment of an ordering or rendering provider for a period of not more than one year, if the provider fails to maintain and, upon request from the commissioner, provide access to documentation relating to written orders or requests for payment for durable medical equipment, certifications for home health services, or referrals for other items or services written or ordered by such provider, when the commissioner has identified a pattern of a lack of documentation. A pattern means a failure to maintain documentation or provide access to documentation on more than one occasion. Nothing in this paragraph limits the authority of the commissioner to sanction a provider under the provisions of section 256B.064. (i) The commissioner shall terminate or deny the enrollment of any individual or entity if the individual or entity has been terminated from participation in Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children's Health Insurance Program of any other state. The commissioner may exempt a rehabilitation agency from termination or denial that would otherwise be required under this paragraph, if the agency: (1) is unable to retain Medicare certification and enrollment solely due to a lack of billing to the Medicare program; (2) meets all other applicable Medicare certification requirements based on an on-site review completed by the commissioner of health; and (3) serves primarily a pediatric population. (j) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a provider designated "moderate" or "high-risk" by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the commissioner permit the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, its agents, or its designated contractors and the state agency, its agents, or its designated contractors to conduct unannounced on-site inspections of any provider location. The commissioner shall publish in the Minnesota Health Care Program Provider Manual a list of provider types designated "limited," "moderate," or "high-risk," based on the criteria and standards used to designate Medicare providers in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 424.518. The list and criteria are not subject to the requirements of chapter 14. The commissioner's designations are not subject to administrative appeal. (k) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a high-risk provider, or a person with a direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider of five percent or higher, consent to criminal background checks, including fingerprinting, when required to do so under state law or by a determination by the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that a provider is designated high-risk for fraud, waste, or abuse. (l)(1) Upon initial enrollment, reenrollment, and notification of revalidation, all durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies (DMEPOS) medical suppliers meeting the durable medical equipment provider and supplier definition in clause (3), operating in Minnesota and receiving Medicaid funds must purchase a surety bond that is annually renewed and designates the Minnesota Department of Human Services as the obligee, and must be submitted in a form approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this clause, the following medical suppliers are not required to obtain a surety bond: a federally qualified health center, a home health agency, the Indian Health Service, a pharmacy, and a rural health clinic. (2) At the time of initial enrollment or reenrollment, durable medical equipment providers and suppliers defined in clause (3) must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is up to and including $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is over $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. (3) "Durable medical equipment provider or supplier" means a medical supplier that can purchase medical equipment or supplies for sale or rental to the general public and is able to perform or arrange for necessary repairs to and maintenance of equipment offered for sale or rental. (m) The Department of Human Services may require a provider to purchase a surety bond as a condition of initial enrollment, reenrollment, reinstatement, or continued enrollment if: (1) the provider fails to demonstrate financial viability, (2) the department determines there is significant evidence of or potential for fraud and abuse by the provider, or (3) the provider or category of providers is designated high-risk pursuant to paragraph (f) and as per Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.450. The surety bond must be in an amount of $100,000 or ten percent of the provider's payments from Medicaid during the immediately preceding 12 months, whichever is greater. The surety bond must name the Department of Human Services as an obligee and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. This paragraph does not apply if the provider currently maintains a surety bond under the requirements in section 256B.0659 or 256B.85.